Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.501

Statewide 911 emergency communications service—Findings.

The legislature finds that statewide 911 emergency communications service has proven to be a lifesaving service and that routing a 911 call to the appropriate public safety answering point with a display of the caller's identification and location should be available for all users of telecommunications services, regardless of the technology used to make and transmit the 911 call. The legislature also finds that it is in the best public interest to ensure that there is adequate ongoing funding to support necessary 911 system upgrades as technology evolves to next generation 911 technology and beyond for 911 emergency communications baseline service statewide that supports emerging communications devices.

[ 2022 c 203 s 6; 2002 c 341 s 1.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Severability—2002 c 341: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2002 c 341 s 14.]

Effective date—2002 c 341: "This act takes effect January 1, 2003." [ 2002 c 341 s 15.]